Hawaii statutes.
§436E-4 Exemptions. A licensed
acupuncturist of another state or country for demonstrations or lectures to be
given at acupuncture or medical society meetings or at acupuncture schools
shall be exempt from licensing procedures set forth in this chapter. [L 1985, c
214, pt of §1; am L 1989, c 180, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next